Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-2313
Retirement system; Auditor of Public
Accounts; audit; report.

It shall be the duty of the Auditor
of Public Accounts to make an annual audit of the retirement system and an
annual report to the retirement board and to the Clerk of the Legislature
of the condition of the retirement system. The
report submitted to the Clerk of the Legislature shall be submitted electronically. Each
member of the Legislature shall receive an electronic copy of the
report required by this section by making a request for such report to either
the Auditor of Public Accounts or the retirement board.

Laws 1965, c. 94, § 13, p. 407;

Laws 1973, LB 214, § 2;

Laws 1979, LB 322, § 5;

Laws 1988, LB 1169, § 1;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 23.